North Carolina, session 2025, SB574.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that healthy soils are a
limited natural resource and fundamental for healthy and sustainable food production. Improving
soil health means increasing soil's organic matter and diversifying its microbial activity to
enhance agricultural productivity and environmental resilience.
SECTION 1.(b) Additional findings. – The General Assembly finds further all of
the following:
(1) That North Carolina is a leading agricultural state with productive soils and
abundant water supplies, and therefore a commitment to maintain healthy and
productive soils and clean water is critical as population and food production
demands rise. However, much of the State's soil has been depleted of organic
matter and trace minerals, making the soil less fertile, requiring more inputs,
and resulting in a degradation of the soil structure that builds resilience and
helps to maintain clean water.
(2) There is a real and pressing opportunity for the state's farmers to capitalize on
the economic and production benefits of improved soil health, while
simultaneously improving surface and ground water quality. Improving the
health of the state's soil is the most effective way for agricultural producers to
increase crop and forage productivity and profitability while also protecting
the environment.
(3) Appropriate planning and coordination is needed to accelerate and coordinate
the adoption of conservation practices that: (i) rebuild and protect soil carbon
to increase water holding capacity and enhance the vitality of the subsurface
microbiome for landowners to capitalize on the economic and production
benefits of soil health; (ii) enhance water quality; (iii) capture carbon; (iv)
build resilience to drought and pests; (v) reduce grenhouse gas emissions; (vi)
expand pollinator and other wildlife habitats; and (vii) protect fragile
ecosystems for a more sustainable future.
SECTION 2. Chapter 139 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 7.
"Healthy Soils Task Force.
"§ 139-70. North Carolina Healthy Soils Task Force.
*S574-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Task Force Established. – The North Carolina Healthy Soils Task Force (Task Force)
is established within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for budgetary
purposes only.
(b) Membership. – The Task Force shall consist of the chairs of the House and Senate
standing committees with responsibility for agriculture issues as nonvoting members and the
following 11 voting members:
(1) The Commissioner of Agriculture or the Commissioner's designee.
(2) The Chair of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission, or the Chair's
designee.
(3) The Dean of the College of Agriculture and Life Sciences at North Carolina
State University, or the Dean's designee.
(4) The Dean of the College of Agriculture and Environmental Sciences at North
Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, or the Dean's designee.
(5) The President and Chief Executive Officer of the Soil Health Institute, or the
President's designee.
(6) The President of the North Carolina Farm Bureau or the President's designee.
(7) The Executive Director of the North Carolina Composting Council or the
Executive Director's designee.
(8) Two members appointed by the Governor who are farmers primarily engaged
in the production of row crops.
(9) Two members appointed by the Governor who are farmers primarily engaged
in the production of specialty crops.
(c) Additional Requirements for Governor's Appointments. – Of the four members
appointed by the Governor under subsection (b) of this section, one shall be a farmer farming
less than 180 acres, and one a farmer farming between 180 and 500 acres. The Governor shall
also make best efforts to appoint members engaged in healthy soils practices, as defined by the
Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.
(d) Meetings and Quorum. – The Task Force shall meet quarterly and at other times at
the call of the chair. A majority of voting members of the Task Force shall constitute a quorum.
(e) Terms and Vacancies. –Terms shall be for a period of two years. The members shall
elect a chair, who shall preside for the duration of the chair's term as a member. In the event a
vacancy occurs in the chair before the expiration of the chair's term, the members shall elect an
acting chair to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. Vacancies in appointed members
will be filled by the Governor to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(f) Staff; Funding. – The Department of Agriculture shall provide staff to assist the Task
Force in its work. The Task Force may use funds allocated to it to contract with consultants and
other professionals to assist the Task Force in the completion of its duties, and may request
additional assistance from appropriate federal and state agencies or programs.
(g) Compensation. – Members of the Task Force, staff, and consultants shall receive
necessary travel and subsistence expenses while on official business of the Task Force in
accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5 or G.S. 138-6, as applicable, paid from funds
allocated to support the work of the Task Force and within the limits of those funds.
"§ 139.71. Healthy Soils Task Force – duties.
The Task Force shall have the following duties:
(1) Develop a comprehensive healthy soils initiative for the State that will be
implemented in a manner that supports local economic growth.
(2) Develop a comprehensive action plan to coordinate efforts to carry out
healthy soils initiatives using standards for organic matter, biological activity,
biological diversity, and soil structure as measures to assess improved soil
health. The action plan shall include goals, timelines for task completion, and
a comprehensive assessment and listing of resources required and available
Page 2 Senate Bill 574-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
resources. In developing the action plan, the Task Force shall examine all of
the following:
a. Issues related to providing farmers and ranchers with research,
education, technical assistance, and demonstration projects.
b. Options for financial incentives to improve soil health.
c. The contribution of livestock to soil health.
(3) Develop recommendations for the use of plants that preserve soil health.
(4) Identify realistic and achievable goals and timelines for improvement of soil
health in the State through voluntary partnerships among agricultural
producers and relevant state and local agencies and other public and private
entities.
(5) Identify actions and activities to increase the generation and use of compost
to increase soil health.
(6) Review provisions of the federal "Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018,"
Pub. L. No. 115-334, and any implementing rules, regulations, and guidelines
of the United States Department of Agriculture and identify opportunities to
leverage state, local, or private funds under the Regional Conservation
Partnership Program of the United States Department of Agriculture and other
conservation programs for the purposes of the healthy soils initiative. The
Task Force shall include information obtained from the review in the report
required by G.S. 139-72(b).
"§ 139-72. Healthy Soils Task Force – Consultation; Report; Expiration.
(a) Consultation. –In carrying out the duties set forth in G.S.139-71, the Task Force may
consult with other agencies or organizations, including all of the following:
(1) The College of Agriculture and Life Sciences at North Carolina State
University, the College of Agriculture and Environmental Sciences at North
Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, NC State Extension,
and North Carolina A&T Cooperative Extension.
(2) The Natural Resources Conservation Service, the Farm Service Agency, and
the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of
Agriculture.
(3) The Soil Health Institute.
(4) The Soil Health Partnership
(5) Any other state and federal agencies or public or private entities with
responsibility or expertise in research, demonstration, education, advising,
funding, or promotion relating to agronomic and other agricultural land
management practices consistent with the purpose of the Task Force.
(b) Report. – or before January 31, 2027, the Task Force shall submit the comprehensive
action plan and report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and to the committees
of the North Carolina House of Representatives and the North Carolina Senate responsible for
agricultural issues."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law, and expires on the earlier of
December 31, 2029 or the date of submission of final report of the Healthy Soils Task Force, as
created in G.S. 139-70, as enacted in Section 2 of this act.
Senate Bill 574-First Edition Page 3